Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.013

Application of sentencing reform act to board decision.

The board shall apply all of the statutory requirements of RCW 9.95.009(2), requiring decisions of the board to be reasonably consistent with the ranges, standards, and purposes of the sentencing reform act, chapter 9.94A RCW, and the minimum term recommendations of the sentencing judge and the prosecuting attorney, to every person who, on July 23, 1989, is incarcerated and has been adjudged under the provisions of RCW 9.92.090.

[ 1989 c 259 s 5.]